Massachusetts, session 194th, H1569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 18Z, as
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, the following section:-
Section 18AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Security services”, a watch, guard or patrol agency as defined in section 22 of chapter
147 or an employee of a senior housing facility who: (i) observes and reports unlawful activity;
(ii) prevents or detects theft or misappropriation of goods, money or other items of value; (iii)
protects individuals or property from harm or misappropriation; and (iv) controls access to
of 2

premises being protected; provided, that security services shall not provided by a law
enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E.
''Secretary'', the secretary of public safety and security.
''Senior housing facility”, (i) a development operated by a housing authority, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 121B, that primarily houses persons 55 years of age or older or persons with
disabilities or (ii) publicly-assisted housing, as defined in section 1 of chapter 40T, that primarily
houses persons 55 years of age or older or persons with disabilities.
(b) Each senior housing facility shall provide security services at all times to ensure the
safety and security of residents. Every employee of a senior housing facility and other
appropriate personnel, as determined by the secretary, shall be trained on safety and security
protocols.
(c) The secretary may promulgate regulations for the implementation of this section, in
consultation with the secretary of elder affairs, the director of housing and community
development, the attorney general, the executive director of the state 911 department, the colonel
of the state police, the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association Incorporated, the
Massachusetts Sheriffs' Association, Inc., the Massachusetts Latino Police Officers Association,
Inc., the Massachusetts Association of Minority Law Enforcement Officers, Inc. and housing
authorities as defined in section 1 of chapter 121B.
of 2